Utah statutes.
63A-5-102.   Meetings of board -- Rules of procedure -- Quorum.

(1)  The chair or any two members may call meetings of the State Building Board.

(2)  The board shall adopt rules of procedure for the conduct of its meetings.

(3)  Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(4)  All meetings of the board shall be conducted in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

